dev/monodix/result.id.dix
    <pardef n="tertawa__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ter"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sekelas__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="attr"/><s n="se"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberhasilan-keberhasilan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberhasilan-keberhasilannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberhasilan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberhasilannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepenyairan-kepenyairan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepenyairan-kepenyairannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepenyairan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepenyairannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kedokteran-kedokteran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kedokteran-kedokterannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kedokteran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kedokterannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterbatasan-keterbatasan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterbatasan-keterbatasannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterbatasan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterbatasannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejajaran-pejajaran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejajaran-pejajarannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejajaran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejajarannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="petinju-petinju__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="petinju-petinjunya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="petinju__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="petinjunya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemberlakuan-pemberlakuan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemberlakuan-pemberlakuannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemberlakuan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemberlakuannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemercontohan-pemercontohan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemercontohan-pemercontohannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemercontohan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemercontohannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pendaftaran-pendaftaran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pendaftaran-pendaftarannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pendaftaran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pendaftarannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penertawaan-penertawaan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penertawaan-penertawaannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penertawaan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penertawaannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembelajar-pembelajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembelajar-pembelajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembelajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembelajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="hasil"><p><l>keberhasilannya</l><r>hasil</r></p><par n="keberhasilannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="raja"><p><l>kerajaan-kerajaan</l><r>raja</r></p><par n="kedokteran-kedokteran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="damai"><p><l>kedamaian</l><r>damai</r></p><par n="kedokteran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iman"><p><l>keimanan</l><r>iman</r></p><par n="kedokteran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="polisi"><p><l>kepolisian</l><r>polisi</r></p><par n="kedokteran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wibawa"><p><l>kewibawaan</l><r>wibawa</r></p><par n="kedokteran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="balik"><p><l>kebalikannya</l><r>balik</r></p><par n="kedokterannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="emas"><p><l>keemasannya</l><r>emas</r></p><par n="kedokterannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaisar"><p><l>kekaisarannya</l><r>kaisar</r></p><par n="kedokterannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paus"><p><l>kepausannya</l><r>paus</r></p><par n="kedokterannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="batas"><p><l>keterbatasan</l><r>batas</r></p><par n="keterbatasan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="belakang"><p><l>keterbelakangan</l><r>belakang</r></p><par n="keterbatasan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kait"><p><l>keterkaitan</l><r>kait</r></p><par n="keterbatasan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karang"><p><l>pekarangan</l><r>karang</r></p><par n="pejajaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="letak"><p><l>peletakan</l><r>letak</r></p><par n="pejajaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="milik"><p><l>pemilikan</l><r>milik</r></p><par n="pejajaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nobat"><p><l>penobatan</l><r>nobat</r></p><par n="pejajaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laksana"><p><l>pelaksanaannya</l><r>laksana</r></p><par n="pejajarannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="makam"><p><l>pemakamannya</l><r>makam</r></p><par n="pejajarannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alam"><p><l>pengalaman-pengalaman</l><r>alam</r></p><par n="pendaftaran-pendaftaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pikir"><p><l>pemikiran-pemikiran</l><r>pikir</r></p><par n="pendaftaran-pendaftaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="berita"><p><l>pemberitaan</l><r>berita</r></p><par n="pendaftaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daftar"><p><l>pendaftaran</l><r>daftar</r></p><par n="pendaftaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kerja"><p><l>pengerjaan</l><r>kerja</r></p><par n="pendaftaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sembah"><p><l>penyembahan</l><r>sembah</r></p><par n="pendaftaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bentuk"><p><l>pembentukannya</l><r>bentuk</r></p><par n="pendaftarannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diri"><p><l>pendiriannya</l><r>diri</r></p><par n="pendaftarannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hasil"><p><l>penghasilannya</l><r>hasil</r></p><par n="pendaftarannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perintah"><p><l>pemerintahannya</l><r>perintah</r></p><par n="pendaftarannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dagang"><p><l>pedagang-pedagang</l><r>dagang</r></p><par n="petinju-petinju__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gawai"><p><l>pegawai</l><r>gawai</r></p><par n="petinju__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laksana"><p><l>pelaksana</l><r>laksana</r></p><par n="petinju__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mukim"><p><l>pemukim</l><r>mukim</r></p><par n="petinju__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tenis"><p><l>petenis</l><r>tenis</r></p><par n="petinju__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gawai"><p><l>pegawainya</l><r>gawai</r></p><par n="petinjunya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laku"><p><l>pelakunya</l><r>laku</r></p><par n="petinjunya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="milik"><p><l>pemiliknya</l><r>milik</r></p><par n="petinjunya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="waris"><p><l>pewarisnya</l><r>waris</r></p><par n="petinjunya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bilah"><p><l>sebilah</l><r>bilah</r></p><par n="sekelas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="garis"><p><l>segaris</l><r>garis</r></p><par n="sekelas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kerabat"><p><l>sekerabat</l><r>kerabat</r></p><par n="sekelas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lor"><p><l>selor</l><r>lor</r></p><par n="sekelas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="musim"><p><l>semusim</l><r>musim</r></p><par n="sekelas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saat"><p><l>sesaat</l><r>saat</r></p><par n="sekelas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cipta"><p><l>tercipta</l><r>cipta</r></p><par n="tertawa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="henti"><p><l>terhenti</l><r>henti</r></p><par n="tertawa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kait"><p><l>terkait</l><r>kait</r></p><par n="tertawa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="luka"><p><l>terluka</l><r>luka</r></p><par n="tertawa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tunda"><p><l>tertunda</l><r>tunda</r></p><par n="tertawa__n"/></e>
